Hawaii statutes.
§440G-11.5 Other duties of
the director; broadband services. (a) In conjunction with broadband
services, the director shall:

(1) Promote and encourage use of telework
alternatives for public and private employees, including appropriate policy and
legislative initiatives;

(2) Advise and assist state agencies, and upon
request of the counties, advise and assist the counties, in planning,
developing, and administering programs, projects, plans, policies, and other
activities to promote telecommuting by employees of state and county agencies;

(3) Support the efforts of both public and private
entities in Hawaii to enhance or facilitate the deployment of, and access to,
competitively priced, advanced electronic communications services, including
broadband and its products and services and internet access services of general
application throughout Hawaii;

(4) Make recommendations to establish affordable,
accessible broadband services to unserved and underserved areas of Hawaii and
monitor advancements in communications that will facilitate this goal;

(5) Advocate for, and facilitate the development and
deployment of, expanded broadband applications, programs, and services,
including telework, telehealth, and e-learning, that will bolster the usage of
and demand for broadband level telecommunications;

(6) Serve as a broadband information and applications
clearinghouse for the State and a coordination point for federal American
Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 broadband-related services and programs;
and

(7) Promote, advocate, and facilitate the
implementation of the findings and recommendations of the Hawaii broadband task
force established by Act 2, First Special Session Laws of Hawaii 2007.

[(b)] The director shall submit an annual
report to the legislature, no later than twenty days prior to the convening of
each regular session, on the department's efforts to use broadband and its
products and services to develop and expand telework initiatives, including
telework participation levels and trends of both private and public sector
employees in Hawaii.

[(c)] The department of commerce and consumer
affairs shall report annually to the legislature, no later than twenty days
prior to the convening of each regular session, on the receipt and expenditure of
federal moneys from the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, and
moneys from other federal appropriation measures or applicable federal acts,
for the purposes of purchasing broadband facilities, services, or equipment or
for entering into contracts for broadband-related projects by all state
agencies for all state agencies approval.

[(d)] Pursuant to [section] 440G-12(d), the
director may appoint and employ engineers, accountants, attorneys, and
professional, clerical, stenographic, or other assistants, as required, with or
without regard to chapter 76. [L 2010, c 199, §§2, 5; am L 2014, c 159, §6]

Note

The following notes supersede the notes at this section on
page 127 of the main volume:

Telework promotion; broadband assistance advisory council;
establishment; purpose. L 2010, c 199, §3; L 2011, c 151, §5; L 2016, c 23, §2.

Installation or development relating to broadband service or
broadband technology infrastructure; exemption from certain permitting
requirements (beginning January 1, 2012); use of utility poles to install new
telecommunications cables, upgrade or replacement not required. L 2011, c 151,
§2; L 2013, c 264, §3 (applicable to permit applications filed after December
31, 2013); L 2016, c 193.

Revision Note

Subsection (c) is codified to this section pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next